lang/common/courses/twolc-lexc/c.twolc
Alphabet
a b c d e f g h i j k
l m n o p q r s t u v
w x y z %>:0
;

Sets

Vow = a e o u i v́ ä ;

Rules

"E Insertion"
0:e <=> [ s | z | s h | c h | \Vow y: ] _ %>: s ;

"Spy rule"
y:i <=> _ :e %>: s ;
                                                                               
!"Dummy rule"                                                                  
!b:p <=> _ .#. ;
